California, session 20252026, AB1249.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 319.5 of the Elections Code is amended to read:319.5. (a) “Electioneering” means the visible display or audible dissemination of information that advocates for or against any candidate or measure on the ballot within the 100 foot limit specified in subdivision (b). Prohibited electioneering information or activity includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:(1) A display of a candidate’s name, likeness, or logo.(2) A display of a ballot measure’s number, title, subject, or logo.(3) Buttons, hats, pencils, pens, shirts, signs, or stickers containing electioneering information.(4) Dissemination of audible electioneering information.(5) Obstructing access to, loitering near, or disseminating visible or audible electioneering information at vote by mail ballot drop boxes.(b) The activities described in subdivision (a) are prohibited within 100 feet of either of the following:(1) The entrance to a building that contains a polling place as defined by Section 338.5, an elections official’s office, or a satellite location.(2) An outdoor site, including a curbside voting area, at which a voter may cast or drop off a ballot.SEC. 2. Section 3016.3 is added to the Elections Code, to read:3016.3. (a) No later than 29 days before the day of the election, any voter using a vote by mail ballot may, prior to the close of the polls on election day, vote the ballot at the office of the elections official or a satellite location. The voter shall vote the ballot in the presence of an officer of the elections official or in a voting booth, at the discretion of the elections official, but in no case may their vote be observed.(b) For a statewide election, a county that does not conduct an election pursuant to Section 4005 shall provide at least one early voting location on the Saturday before the day of the election that is open for a minimum of six hours.(c) (1) For purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b), the elections official shall do all of the following:(A) Provide at least one voting unit that is certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State to allow voters with disabilities the access required under the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(B) Permit a voter to vote their vote by mail ballot as provided in Section 3016.5.(C) Provide notice of any satellite location not later than two weeks before voting may occur at the satellite location.(2) For purposes of the early voting location described in subdivision (b), the elections official shall also permit a voter to do all of the following:(A) Return the voter’s vote by mail ballot.(B) Register to vote, update the voter’s voter registration, and vote pursuant to Section 2170.(C) Receive and vote a provisional ballot pursuant to Section 3016 or Article 5 (commencing with Section 14310) of Chapter 3 of Division 14.(D) Receive a replacement ballot upon verification that a ballot for the same election has not been received from the voter by the county elections official. If the county elections official is unable to determine if a ballot for the same election has been received from the voter, the county elections official may issue a provisional ballot.(E) Vote a regular, provisional, or replacement ballot using accessible voting equipment that provides for a private and independent voting experience.SEC. 3. Section 3016.5 of the Elections Code is amended to read:3016.5. (a) A voter may vote their vote by mail ballot, without the identification envelope, in person at the office of the county elections official, a satellite location, the polling place designated for the voter’s home precinct, or a vote center established pursuant to Section 4005, if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The county elections official or their staff, including any staff managing a satellite location, a precinct board, or a vote center election board, as applicable, has real-time access to the county elections official’s election management system, and does both of the following:(A) Verifies that the voter has not returned a vote by mail ballot for that election.(B) Changes the status of the voter in the election management system from a vote by mail voter to an in person voter.(2) After the voter’s status has been changed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), the voter provides their name, address, and signature pursuant to Section 14216.(3) The county elections official has established procedures to ensure that a voter who casts a ballot pursuant to this subdivision does not submit more than one vote by mail ballot without the identification envelope, and the precinct board or vote center election board complies with those procedures.(b) A ballot cast pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be processed and counted in the same manner as a nonprovisional ballot cast in person at the polling place or vote center.(c) The elections official shall provide notice of any satellite location not later than two weeks before voting may occur at the satellite location.SEC. 4. Section 3018 of the Elections Code is repealed.SEC. 5. Section 18370 of the Elections Code is amended to read:18370. (a) A person shall not, on election day, or at any time that a voter may be casting a ballot, within the 100 foot limit specified in subdivision (b), do any of the following:(1) Circulate an initiative, referendum, recall, or nomination petition or any other petition.(2) Solicit a vote or speak to a voter on the subject of marking the voter’s ballot.(3) Place a sign relating to voters’ qualifications or speak to a voter on the subject of the voter’s qualifications except as provided in Section 14240.(4) Do any electioneering as defined by Section 319.5.(b) The activities described in subdivision (a) are prohibited within 100 feet of either of the following:(1) The entrance to a building that contains a polling place as defined by Section 338.5, an elections official’s office, or a satellite location.(2) An outdoor site, including a curbside voting area, at which a voter may cast or drop off a ballot.(c) A person shall not, on election day, or at any time that a voter may be casting a ballot, do any of the following within the immediate vicinity of a voter in line to cast a ballot or drop off a ballot:(1) Solicit a vote.(2) Speak to a voter about marking the voter’s ballot.(3) Disseminate visible or audible electioneering information.(d) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.SEC. 6. Section 18502 of the Elections Code is amended to read:18502. (a) Any person who in any manner interferes with the officers holding an election or conducting a canvass, as to prevent the election or canvass from being fairly held and lawfully conducted, or with the voters lawfully exercising their rights of voting at an election, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.(b) For purposes of this section, “officers holding an election or conducting a canvass” include, but are not limited to, the Secretary of State as the chief elections officer, and their staff, as it relates to performance of any of their duties related to administering the provisions of the Elections Code, and elections officials and their staff, including temporary workers and poll workers, and members of a precinct board, in their performance of any duty related to assisting with holding an election or conducting a canvass.(c) For purposes of this section, “holding an election or conducting a canvass” includes, but is not limited to, the election observation process governed by the Elections Code and applicable regulations adopted by the Secretary of State.(d) For purposes of this section, “voting at an election” includes, but is not limited to, voting in person at a polling place, the office of the elections official, and satellite locations, and voting by mail and returning a voted ballot pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3017.SEC. 7. Section 18540 of the Elections Code is amended to read:18540. (a) Every person who makes use of or threatens to make use of any force, violence, or tactic of coercion or intimidation, to induce or compel any other person to vote or refrain from voting at any election or to vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at any election, or because any person voted or refrained from voting at any election or voted or refrained from voting for any particular person or measure at any election is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.(b) Every person who hires or arranges for any other person to make use of or threaten to make use of any force, violence, or tactic of coercion or intimidation, to induce or compel any other person to vote or refrain from voting at any election or to vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at any election, or because any person voted or refrained from voting at any election or voted or refrained from voting for any particular person or measure at any election is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.(c) For purposes of this section, “voting at any election” includes, but is not limited to, voting in person at a polling place, the office of the elections official, and satellite locations, and voting by mail and returning a voted ballot pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3017.SEC. 8. Section 18541 of the Elections Code is amended to read:18541. (a) A person shall not, with the intent of dissuading another person from voting, within the 100 foot limit specified in subdivision (b), do any of the following:(1) Solicit a vote or speak to a voter on the subject of marking the voter’s ballot.(2) Place a sign relating to voters’ qualifications or speak to a voter on the subject of the voter’s qualifications except as provided in Section 14240.(3) Photograph, video record, or otherwise record a voter entering or exiting a polling place.(4) Obstruct ingress, egress, or parking.(b) The activities described in subdivision (a) are prohibited within 100 feet of either of the following:(1) The entrance to a building that contains a polling place as defined by Section 338.5, an elections official’s office, or a satellite location.(2) An outdoor site, including a curbside voting area, at which a voter may cast or drop off a ballot.(c) A person shall not, with the intent of dissuading another person from voting, do any of the following within the immediate vicinity of a voter in line to cast a ballot or drop off a ballot:(1) Solicit a vote.(2) Speak to a voter about marking the voter’s ballot.(3) Disseminate visible or audible electioneering information.(d) A violation of this section is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than 12 months, or in state prison. Any person who conspires to violate this section is guilty of a felony.SEC. 9. Section 66852 of the Education Code is amended to read:66852. Each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, do all of the following:(a) (1) In consultation with the Secretary of State, during the first month of each academic semester or quarter, distribute campuswide emails to all students providing the following civic and election dates and information:(A) National Voter Registration Day, held annually on the fourth Tuesday in September.(B) The last day to register to vote online or to register to vote by mail or in person.(C) The date when a county may begin to offer early voting at the office of the elections official or at a satellite location, pursuant to Section 3016.3 of the Elections Code, and a statement that the date, times, and locations for early voting and conditional voter registration may be confirmed on the internet website of the Secretary of State or at the county elections office.(D) The primary and general election dates as provided in Chapter 4 of Division 0.5 of the Elections Code and Division 1 of the Elections Code.(E) A statement that, pursuant to Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Elections Code, a voter may apply to vote by mail at any time until after the seventh day prior to an election, and that a vote by mail voter may vote in person at the office of the county elections official or at a satellite location established by the county elections official on or before the day of the election.(F) A link to the internet web page for the Secretary of State’s Students Vote Project, established pursuant to Section 2148.5 of the Elections Code.(2) In consultation with the Secretary of State, one month before each statewide election, distribute by campuswide emails to all students the dates and information specified in subparagraphs (A) through (F) of paragraph (1) and an internet website address link or unique Uniform Resource Locator (URL) link furnished by the Secretary of State’s office providing all of the following election information:(A) The Secretary of State’s internet web page for online voter registration. That website shall include a statement providing the information specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).(B) The Secretary of State’s internet website address for election information.(C) The Secretary of State’s internet website address for the most current voter information guide, required to be prepared pursuant to Section 9082.7 of the Elections Code.(D) The Secretary of State’s internet website address for the voter registration status tool, or a similar web page that directs the recipient to voter or election information for the county of the recipient.(E) A disclaimer stating all of the following:(i) That the civic and election information provided applies to the county where the campus is located.(ii) That election information varies by county.(iii) That recipients of the email are encouraged to check the internet website containing the Secretary of State’s voter registration status tool, or a similar web page, to find election information for the county where the recipient’s voter registration is active.(3) Include in both printed and electronic academic calendars the dates specified in subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1).(b) (1) Post on social media reminders to students, at least one day before each event occurs unless specified otherwise, of all of the following:(A) The early voting and conditional voter registration information specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(B) Election day, including a reminder the day before and the day of the election. The reminders shall state that a qualified voter may register to vote on the day of the election, if necessary, at a conditional voter registration site established by the voter’s county elections official.(C) After the emails required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) are sent, the voter information guide and county sample ballot information provided in that email.(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the social media content can be furnished, or requested, by the Secretary of State.(c) (1) Designate one person per campus to act as a Civic and Voter Empowerment Coordinator, who shall do all of the following:(A) Implement the requirements of this section.(B) Ensure that, in every academic year, each campus holds a minimum of three election outreach events to increase civic learning, democratic participation, civic engagement, and voter turnout consistent with all of the following:(i) During an academic term in each even-numbered year, an outreach event shall occur within the final 30 days preceding each statewide primary and general election.(ii) All students shall be invited to participate in the coordination of and to attend these events.(iii) All events may be sponsored by a campus-based student organization.(C) Develop a Civic and Voter Empowerment Action Plan consistent with all of the following:(i) The coordinator shall invite leadership from faculty and students, and administrators from each of student affairs, academic affairs, and government relations or a similar office to participate in a meeting or meetings to develop the action plan.(ii) The action plan shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, a campus-specific effort to increase civic learning and democratic participation, with an emphasis on civic engagement, voter turnout, and community building.(iii) Students shall be invited to develop the action plan and to coordinate the meeting or meetings to develop the action plan.(D) The coordinator shall share the action plan developed pursuant to subparagraph (C) with the Secretary of State no later than December 1, 2020, for inclusion in the report to the Legislature submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 66851. The action plan shall be periodically updated and resubmitted to the Secretary of State, as determined necessary by the coordinator.(2) The Civic and Voter Empowerment Coordinator shall be nonpartisan.SEC. 10. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.